Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 4, section 2, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Department of Education 3,000,000 2,750,000 (a) $2,750,000 each year is appropriated to the commissioner of education for grants to the 12 Minnesota regional library systems to provide educational opportunities in the arts, history, literary arts, and cultural heritage of Minnesota. When possible, funding under this subdivision should be used to promote and share the work of Minnesota authors, including authors from diverse backgrounds. This money must be allocated using the formulas in Minnesota Statutes, section 134.355, subdivisions 3 to 5, with the remaining 25 percent to be distributed to all qualifying systems in an amount proportionate to the number of qualifying system entities in each system. For purposes of this subdivision, "qualifying system entity" means a public library, a regional library system, a regional library system headquarters, a county, or an outreach service program. This money may be used to sponsor programs provided by regional libraries or to provide grants to local arts and cultural heritage programs for programs in partnership with regional libraries. This money must be distributed in ten equal payments per year. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered on or before June 30, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , as grants or contracts in this subdivision are available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end . (b) $250,000 the first year is appropriated to the commissioner of education for a water safety grant program. The commissioner of education must allocate grants to eligible applicants. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations and city and county parks and recreation programs providing swimming lessons to youth. Eligible applicants are not required to partner with other entities. Grant funds must primarily be used to provide scholarships to low-income and at-risk children for swimming lessons. Up to 15 percent of the grant funds may also be used to hire water safety instructors or lifeguards or train water safety instructors or lifeguards in nationally recognized water safety practices and instruction. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of education for grants to the 12 Minnesota regional library systems to provide educational opportunities in the arts, history, literary arts, and cultural heritage of Minnesota. The money must be allocated using the formulas in Minnesota Statutes, section 134.355, subdivisions 3, 4, and 5, with the remaining 25 percent to be distributed to all qualifying systems in an amount proportionate to the number of qualifying system entities in each system. For purposes of this section, "qualifying system entity" means a public library, a regional library system, a regional library system headquarters, a county, or an outreach service program. The money may be used to sponsor programs provided by regional libraries or to provide grants to local arts and cultural heritage programs for programs in partnership with regional libraries. The money must be distributed in ten equal payments per year. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered on or before June 30, 2028, as grants or contracts under this section are available until June 30, 2029. new text end